Illinois, session 104th, HB1704.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6z-27 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-27)7    Sec. 6z-27. All moneys in the Audit Expense Fund shall be 8transferred, appropriated and used only for the purposes 9authorized by, and subject to the limitations and conditions 10prescribed by, the Illinois State Auditing Act.11    Within 30 days after July 1, 2025 2024, or as soon 12thereafter as practical, the State Comptroller shall order 13transferred and the State Treasurer shall transfer from the 14following funds moneys in the specified amounts for deposit 15into the Audit Expense Fund: 16Academic Quality Assurance Fund..........................$940 17African-American HIV/AIDS Response Fund................$4,266 18Agricultural Premium Fund............................$169,467 19Alzheimer's Awareness Fund.............................$1,068 20Alzheimer's Disease Research,21    Care, and Support Fund...............................$502 22Amusement Ride and Patron Safety Fund..................$6,888 23Assisted Living and Shared  HB1704- 2 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1    Housing Regulatory Fund............................$4,011 2Board of Higher Education State3    Contracts and Grants Fund.........................$13,416 4Capital Development Board Revolving Fund..............$10,7115Care Provider Fund for Persons with6    a Developmental Disability.........................$9,7717CDLIS/AAMVANET/NMVTIS Trust Fund.......................$3,4338Chicago State University Education9    Improvement Fund..................................$15,774 10Child Labor and Day and Temporary11    Labor Enforcement Fund............................$15,414 12Child Support Administrative Fund......................$3,739 13Coal Technology Development14    Assistance Fund....................................$3,019 15Common School Fund...................................$246,578 16Community Mental Health17    Medicaid Trust Fund...............................$10,597 18Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund..................$1,700 19Death Certificate Surcharge Fund.......................$1,550 20Death Penalty Abolition Fund...........................$2,688 21Department of Business Services22    Special Operations Fund...........................$10,406 23Department of Human Services24    Community Services Fund...........................$15,086 25Dram Shop Fund.......................................$212,500 26Driver Services Administration Fund......................$937   HB1704- 3 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Drug Rebate Fund......................................$54,214 2Drug Treatment Fund....................................$1,236 3Education Assistance Fund..........................$2,193,017 4Emergency Planning and Training Fund.....................$528 5Emergency Public Health Fund...........................$8,769 6Employee Classification Fund.............................$967 7EMS Assistance Fund....................................$1,150 8Estate Tax Refund Fund.................................$1,628 9Facilities Management Revolving Fund..................$35,073 10Facility Licensing Fund................................$6,082 11Fair and Exposition Fund...............................$6,903 12Federal Financing Cost13    Reimbursement Fund.................................$7,100 14Feed Control Fund.....................................$13,874 15Fertilizer Control Fund................................$9,357 16Fire Prevention Fund...................................$4,282 17General Assembly Technology Fund.......................$2,830 18General Professions Dedicated Fund.....................$4,131 19General Revenue Fund..............................$17,653,153 20Governor's Administrative Fund.........................$5,956 21Governor's Grant Fund..................................$3,164 22Grant Accountability and Transparency Fund.............$1,041 23Guardianship and Advocacy Fund........................$16,432 24Health Facility Plan Review Fund.......................$2,286 25Health and Human Services26    Medicaid Trust Fund...............................$10,902   HB1704- 4 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Healthcare Provider Relief Fund......................$321,428 2Home Care Services Agency Licensure Fund...............$2,843 3Hospital Licensure Fund................................$1,251 4Hospital Provider Fund................................$99,530 5Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund................$19,809 6Illinois Community College Board7    Contracts and Grants Fund.........................$14,687 8Illinois Health Facilities Planning Fund...............$3,155 9Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Fund................$11,636 10IMSA Income Fund.......................................$6,805 11Illinois School Asbestos Abatement Fund................$1,141 12Illinois State Fair Fund..............................$69,621 13Illinois Telecommunications Access14    Corporation Fund...................................$1,546 15Illinois Underground Utility16    Facilities Damage Prevention Fund.................$12,035 17Illinois Veterans' Rehabilitation Fund.................$1,103 18Illinois Workers' Compensation19    Commission Operations Fund.......................$241,658 20Industrial Hemp Regulatory Fund........................$1,407 21Interpreters for the Deaf Fund.........................$8,657 22Lead Poisoning Screening, Prevention,23    and Abatement Fund................................$19,789 24Lobbyist Registration Administration Fund................$843 25Long Term Care Monitor/Receiver Fund..................$42,485 26Long-Term Care Provider Fund..........................$20,620   HB1704- 5 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Low-Level Radioactive Waste Facility2    Development and Operation Fund.....................$2,402 3Mandatory Arbitration Fund.............................$2,635 4Mental Health Fund.....................................$5,353 5Mental Health Reporting Fund...........................$1,226 6Metabolic Screening and Treatment Fund................$46,885 7Monitoring Device Driving Permit8    Administration Fee Fund............................$1,475 9Motor Fuel Tax Fund....................................$1,068 10Motor Vehicle License Plate Fund......................$13,927 11Multiple Sclerosis Research Fund.........................$961 12Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund............$87,774 13Nursing Dedicated and Professional Fund..................$595 14Partners For Conservation Fund.......................$117,108 15Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund...............$218,128 16Pesticide Control Fund................................$42,146 17Plumbing Licensure and Program Fund....................$3,672 18Private Business and Vocational Schools19    Quality Assurance Fund...............................$867 20Professional Services Fund............................$90,610 21Public Defender Fund...................................$6,198 22Public Health Laboratory23    Services Revolving Fund............................$1,098 24Public Utility Fund..................................$282,488 25Radiation Protection Fund.............................$37,946 26Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund........................$58,858   HB1704- 6 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Rental Housing Support Program Fund....................$4,083 2Road Fund.............................................$55,409 3Secretary Of State DUI Administration Fund.............$2,767 4Secretary Of State Identification Security5    and Theft Prevention Fund.........................$16,793 6Secretary Of State Special License Plate Fund..........$3,473 7Secretary Of State Special Services Fund..............$26,832 8Securities Audit and Enforcement Fund..................$4,889 9Serve Illinois Commission Fund.........................$1,803 10Special Education Medicaid Matching Fund...............$4,329 11State Gaming Fund......................................$1,997 12State Garage Revolving Fund............................$7,501 13State Lottery Fund...................................$311,489 14State Pensions Fund..................................$500,000 15State Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund................752 16Supreme Court Special Purposes Fund....................$4,184 17Tattoo and Body Piercing Establishment18    Registration Fund..................................$1,166 19Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund.....................$143,143 20Tourism Promotion Fund................................$79,695 21Transportation Regulatory Fund.......................$108,481 22Trauma Center Fund.....................................$1,872 23University Of Illinois Hospital Services Fund..........$5,476 24Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention and25    Insurance Verification Trust Fund..................$9,331 26Vehicle Inspection Fund................................$2,786   HB1704- 7 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Weights and Measures Fund.............................$24,640 2Attorney General Court Ordered and Voluntary3    Compliance Payment Projects Fund..................$22,4704Aggregate Operations Regulatory Fund.....................$6055Agricultural Premium Fund.............................$21,0026Attorney General's State Projects and7    Court Ordered Distribution Fund...................$36,8738Anna Veterans Home Fund................................$1,2059Appraisal Administration Fund..........................$2,67010Attorney General Whistleblower Reward11    and Protection Fund..................................$93812Bank and Trust Company Fund...........................$82,94513Brownfields Redevelopment Fund.........................$1,89314Cannabis Business Development Fund....................$15,75015Cannabis Expungement Fund..............................$2,51116Capital Development Board Revolving Fund...............$4,66817Care Provider Fund for Persons with18    a Developmental Disability.........................$6,79419CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund.......................$1,67920Cemetery Oversight Licensing and Disciplinary Fund.....$6,18721Chicago State University Education Improvement Fund...$16,89322Chicago Travel Industry Promotion Fund.................$9,14623Child Support Administrative Fund......................$2,66924Clean Air Act Permit Fund.............................$11,28325Coal Technology Development Assistance Fund...........$22,08726Community Association Manager  HB1704- 8 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1    Licensing and Disciplinary Fund....................$1,1782Commitment to Human Services Fund ...................$259,0503Common School Fund ..................................$385,3624Community Mental Health Medicaid Trust Fund............$6,9725Community Water Supply Laboratory Fund...................$8356Credit Union Fund.....................................$21,9447Cycle Rider Safety Training Fund.........................$7048DCFS Children's Services Fund........................$164,0369Department of Business Services Special Operations Fund.$4,56410Department of Corrections Reimbursement11    and Education Fund................................$23,89212Design Professionals Administration13    and Investigation Fund.............................$3,89214Department of Human Services Community Services Fund...$6,31415Downstate Public Transportation Fund..................$40,42816Drivers Education Fund...................................$90417Drug Rebate Fund......................................$40,70718Drug Treatment Fund......................................$81019Drycleaner Environmental Response Trust Fund...........$1,55520Education Assistance Fund..........................$2,347,92821Electric Vehicle Rebate Fund..........................$24,10122Energy Efficiency Trust Fund.............................$95523Energy Transition Assistance Fund......................$1,19324Environmental Protection Permit and Inspection Fund...$17,47525Facilities Management Revolving Fund..................$21,29826Fair and Exposition Fund.................................$782  HB1704- 9 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Federal Asset Forfeiture Fund..........................$1,1952Federal High Speed Rail Trust Fund.......................$9103Federal Workforce Training Fund......................$113,6094Feed Control Fund......................................$1,2635Fertilizer Control Fund..................................$7786Fire Prevention Fund...................................$4,4707Freedom Schools Fund.....................................$6368Fund for the Advancement of Education.................$61,7679General Professions Dedicated Fund....................$36,10810General Revenue Fund..............................$17,653,15311Grade Crossing Protection Fund.........................$7,75912Hazardous Waste Fund...................................$9,03613Health and Human Services Medicaid Trust Fund............$79314Healthcare Provider Relief Fund......................$209,86315Historic Property Administrative Fund....................$79116Horse Racing Fund....................................$233,68517Hospital Provider Fund................................$66,98418Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund................$30,42419Illinois Charity Bureau Fund...........................$2,02520Illinois Clean Water Fund.............................$18,92821Illinois Forestry Development Fund....................$13,05422Illinois Gaming Law Enforcement Fund...................$1,41123IMSA Income Fund......................................$10,49924Illinois Military Family Relief Fund...................$2,96325Illinois National Guard Construction Fund..............$4,94426Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund................$154,375  HB1704- 10 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Illinois State Dental Disciplinary Fund................$3,9472Illinois State Fair Fund...............................$5,8713Illinois State Medical Disciplinary Fund..............$32,8094Illinois State Pharmacy Disciplinary Fund.............$10,9935Illinois Student Assistance Commission6    Contracts and Grants Fund............................$9507Illinois Veterans Assistance Fund......................$2,7388Illinois Veterans' Rehabilitation Fund...................$6859Illinois Wildlife Preservation Fund....................$2,64610Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission11    Operations Fund...................................$94,94212Illinois Works Fund....................................$5,57713Income Tax Refund Fund...............................$232,36414Insurance Financial Regulation Fund..................$158,26615Insurance Premium Tax Refund Fund.....................$10,97216Insurance Producer Administration Fund...............$208,18517International Tourism Fund.............................$1,31718LaSalle Veterans Home Fund.............................$2,65619Law Enforcement Recruitment and Retention Fund........$10,24920Law Enforcement Training Fund.........................$28,71421LEADS Maintenance Fund...................................$57322Live and Learn Fund....................................$8,41923Local Government Distributive Fund...................$120,74524Local Tourism Fund....................................$16,58225Long Term Care Ombudsman Fund............................$63526Long-Term Care Provider Fund..........................$10,352  HB1704- 11 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Manteno Veterans Home Fund.............................$3,9412Mental Health Fund.....................................$3,5603Mental Health Reporting Fund.............................$8784Military Affairs Trust Fund............................$1,0175Monitoring Device Driving Permit6    Administration Fee Fund..............................$6577Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund...................$1,8928Motor Fuel Tax Fund..................................$124,5709Motor Vehicle License Plate Fund.......................$6,36310Nursing Dedicated and Professional Fund...............$14,67111Off-Highway Vehicle Trails Fund........................$1,43112Open Space Lands Acquisition and Development Fund.....$67,76413Optometric Licensing and Disciplinary Board Fund.........$92214Parity Advancement Fund................................$9,34915Partners For Conservation Fund........................$25,30916Pawnbroker Regulation Fund...............................$65917Pension Stabilization Fund.............................$3,00918Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund...............$251,56919Pesticide Control Fund.................................$4,71520Prisoner Review Board Vehicle and Equipment Fund.......$3,03521Professional Services Fund.............................$3,09322Professions Indirect Cost Fund.......................$194,39823Public Pension Regulation Fund.........................$3,51924Public Transportation Fund...........................$108,26425Quincy Veterans Home Fund.............................$25,45526Real Estate License Administration Fund...............$27,976  HB1704- 12 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund.........................$3,6822Regional Transportation Authority Occupation and Use Tax3    Replacement Fund...................................$3,2264Registered Certified Public Accountants' Administration5    and Disciplinary Fund..............................$3,2136Renewable Energy Resources Trust Fund..................$2,4637Rental Housing Support Program Fund......................$5608Residential Finance Regulatory Fund...................$21,6729Road Fund............................................$524,72910Salmon Fund..............................................$83711Savings Bank Regulatory Fund.............................$52812School Infrastructure Fund............................$10,12213Secretary of State DUI Administration Fund.............$1,02114Secretary of State Identification Security and15    Theft Prevention Fund..............................$4,87716Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund..........$1,41017Secretary of State Special Services Fund..............$11,66518Securities Audit and Enforcement Fund..................$2,27919Serve Illinois Commission Fund...........................$95020Snowmobile Trail Establishment Fund......................$65321Solid Waste Management Fund...........................$17,54022Special Education Medicaid Matching Fund...............$2,91623Sports Wagering Fund..................................$14,69624State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund.......$3,63525State and Local Sales Tax Reform Fund..................$6,67626State Asset Forfeiture Fund............................$1,445  HB1704- 13 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1State Aviation Program Fund............................$2,1252State Construction Account Fund......................$151,0793State Crime Laboratory Fund............................$6,3424State Gaming Fund....................................$216,4755State Garage Revolving Fund............................$4,8926State Lottery Fund...................................$106,1697State Pensions Fund .................................$500,0008State Police Firearm Services Fund....................$16,0499State Police Services Fund............................$20,68810State Police Vehicle Fund..............................$7,56211State Police Whistleblower Reward12    and Protection Fund................................$3,85813State Small Business Credit Initiative Fund...........$20,73914State's Attorneys Appellate15    Prosecutor's County Fund..........................$20,62116Subtitle D Management Fund.............................$2,66917Supplemental Low-Income Energy Assistance Fund.......$158,17318Tax Compliance and Administration Fund.................$3,78919Technology Management Revolving Fund.................$620,43520Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund.......................$4,74721Tourism Promotion Fund................................$46,99822Traffic and Criminal Conviction Surcharge Fund........$41,17323Underground Storage Tank Fund.........................$31,31424University of Illinois Hospital Services Fund..........$3,25725Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft26    Prevention and Insurance Verification Trust Fund...$8,183  HB1704- 14 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1Vehicle Inspection Fund...............................$19,8112Weights and Measures Fund..............................$3,6363    Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, 4the General Assembly hereby authorizes the use of such funds 5for the purposes set forth in this Section.6    These provisions do not apply to funds classified by the 7Comptroller as federal trust funds or State trust funds. The 8Audit Expense Fund may receive transfers from those trust 9funds only as directed herein, except where prohibited by the 10terms of the trust fund agreement. The Auditor General shall 11notify the trustees of those funds of the estimated cost of the 12audit to be incurred under the Illinois State Auditing Act for 13the fund. The trustees of those funds shall direct the State 14Comptroller and Treasurer to transfer the estimated amount to 15the Audit Expense Fund.16    The Auditor General may bill entities that are not subject 17to the above transfer provisions, including private entities, 18related organizations and entities whose funds are 19locally-held, for the cost of audits, studies, and 20investigations incurred on their behalf. Any revenues received 21under this provision shall be deposited into the Audit Expense 22Fund.23    In the event that moneys on deposit in any fund are 24unavailable, by reason of deficiency or any other reason 25preventing their lawful transfer, the State Comptroller shall 26order transferred and the State Treasurer shall transfer the   HB1704- 15 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b1amount deficient or otherwise unavailable from the General 2Revenue Fund for deposit into the Audit Expense Fund.3    On or before December 1, 1992, and each December 1 4thereafter, the Auditor General shall notify the Governor's 5Office of Management and Budget (formerly Bureau of the 6Budget) of the amount estimated to be necessary to pay for 7audits, studies, and investigations in accordance with the 8Illinois State Auditing Act during the next succeeding fiscal 9year for each State fund for which a transfer or reimbursement 10is anticipated.11    Beginning with fiscal year 1994 and during each fiscal 12year thereafter, the Auditor General may direct the State 13Comptroller and Treasurer to transfer moneys from funds 14authorized by the General Assembly for that fund. In the event 15funds, including federal and State trust funds but excluding 16the General Revenue Fund, are transferred, during fiscal year 171994 and during each fiscal year thereafter, in excess of the 18amount to pay actual costs attributable to audits, studies, 19and investigations as permitted or required by the Illinois 20State Auditing Act or specific action of the General Assembly, 21the Auditor General shall, on September 30, or as soon 22thereafter as is practicable, direct the State Comptroller and 23Treasurer to transfer the excess amount back to the fund from 24which it was originally transferred.25(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 26103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-129, eff. 6-30-23; 103-588, eff.   HB1704- 16 -LRB104 03339 HLH 13361 b16-5-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.